Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.40.180

Student engagement hubs.

(1) Each state university, regional university, and The Evergreen State College as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 and each higher education campus as defined in RCW 28B.45.012 shall open a nonpartisan student engagement hub on its campus. The student engagement hub may be open during business hours beginning eight days before, and ending at 8:00 p.m. on the day of, the general election. All student engagement hubs must allow students to download their exact ballot from an online portal. Upon request of the student government organization to the administration and the county auditor, the student engagement hub at a state university, regional university, or The Evergreen State College as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 must allow voters to register in person pursuant to RCW 29A.08.140(1)(b) and provide voter registration materials and ballots.

(2) Each institution shall contract with the county auditor for the operation of a student engagement hub under this section.

(3) Student engagement hubs are not voting centers as outlined in RCW 29A.40.160 and must be operated in a manner that avoids partisan influence or electioneering.

[ 2020 c 208 s 10.]

NOTES:

Short title—Findings—2020 c 208: See notes following RCW 29A.08.210.